District of Columbia statutes.
47-355.03

Reporting requirements of managers.

A manager shall develop year-end spending projections, by source of funds, on a quarterly basis, which show year-to-date spending, approved budget, year-end projected spending, explanations of variances greater than 5%, and in the case of overspending, a corrective action plan. Spending projections shall be submitted to the agency head and the agency fiscal officer. Summarized agency spending projections shall be submitted to the Chief Financial Officer no more than 30 days after the end of the quarter.

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-285, § 2, 50 DCR 940
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-293, § 2(b), 54 DCR 1083
D.C. Law 16-293, substituted “quarterly” for “monthly”, “fiscal” for “chief financial”, and “quarter” for “month”.